Utah statutes.
42-2-10.   Penalties.

Any person who carries on, conducts, or transacts business under an assumed name without having complied with the provisions of this chapter, and until the provisions of this chapter are complied with:

(1)  shall not sue, prosecute, or maintain any action, suit, counterclaim, cross complaint, or proceeding in any of the courts of this state; and

(2)  may be subject to a penalty in the form of a late filing fee determined by the division director in an amount not to exceed three times the fees charged under Section 42-2-7 and established under Section 63J-1-504.



Amended by Chapter 183, 2009 General Session

